North Carolina, session 2025, HB802.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 29A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-407.1. Definitions.
For the purposes of this Article, the following definitions apply:
(1) Hemp product. – Products derived from hemp, as defined in G.S. 90-87, and
their synthetic counterparts that are designed, manufactured, or sold to be
inhaled or otherwise consumed, including the substances commonly known
as "delta-8," "delta-9," and "CBD."
(2) Nicotine product. – Includes any of the following:
a. Tobacco product. – Any product that contains tobacco and is intended
for human consumption. For purposes of this section, the term includes
an alternative nicotine product, vapor product, consumable product, or
components of a vapor product.
b. Alternative nicotine product. – Any noncombustible product that
contains nicotine, whether natural or synthetic, but does not contain
tobacco and is intended for human consumption whether chewed,
absorbed, dissolved, ingested, or by other means. This term does not
include a vapor product or any product regulated by the United States
Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the Federal Food,
Drug, and Cosmetic Act.
(3) Vapor product. – Any noncombustible product that employs a mechanical
heating element, battery, or electronic circuit regardless of shape or size and
that can be used to heat a consumable product. The term includes an electronic
cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, and electronic pipe. The term
does not include any product regulated by the United States Food and Drug
Administration under Chapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic
Act."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-407 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-407. Policy prohibiting tobacco nicotine, hemp, and vapor product use in school
buildings, grounds, and at school-sponsored events.
*H802-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Not later than August 1, 2008, local boards of education Governing bodies of public
school units shall adopt, implement, and enforce adopt a written policy prohibiting at all times
the use of any tobacco nicotine, hemp, and vapor product by any person in school buildings, in
school facilities, on school campuses, and in or on any other school property owned or operated
by the local school administrative public school unit. The policy shall further prohibit the use of
all tobacco nicotine, hemp, and vapor products by persons attending a school-sponsored event at
a location not listed in this subsection when in the presence of students or school personnel or in
an area where smoking is otherwise prohibited by law.
(b) The policy shall include at least all of the following elements:
(1) Adequate notice to students, parents, the public, and school personnel of the
policy.
(2) Posting of signs prohibiting at all times the use of tobacco nicotine, hemp, and
vapor products by any person in and on school property.
(3) Requirements that school personnel enforce the policy.
(c) The policy may permit tobacco nicotine, hemp, and vapor products to be included in
instructional or research activities in public school buildings if the activity is conducted or
supervised by the faculty member overseeing the instruction or research and the activity does not
include smoking, chewing, or otherwise ingesting the tobacco nicotine, hemp, or vapor product.
(d) The North Carolina Health and Wellness Trust Fund Commission Department of
Health and Human Services shall work with local boards of education governing bodies of public
school units to provide assistance with the implementation of this policy including providing
evidence-based, age-appropriate information regarding smoking nicotine, hemp, and vapor
cessation and use prevention resources. resources to students at the beginning of each school
year. Students shall be able to access evidence-based, age-appropriate nicotine, hemp, and vapor
product cessation and use prevention materials throughout the school year.
(d1) Nothing in this section, G.S. 143-595 through G.S. 143-601, or any other section
prohibits a local board of education governing body of a public school unit from adopting and
enforcing a more restrictive policy on the use of tobacco nicotine, hemp, and vapor products in
school buildings, in school facilities, on school campuses, or at school-related or
school-sponsored events, and in or on other school property.
(e) Any information or resources given or made available to students pursuant to this
section shall be first approved by the Department of Health and Human Services before
distribution. In approving materials pursuant to this section, the Department of Health and
Human Services shall ensure that nicotine, hemp, and vapor product cessation and use prevention
materials are evidence-based and shall identify the ages or grades of students for which the
material is appropriate. A school may request specific material be reviewed for possible approval
by the Department of Health and Human Services."
SECTION 2.(a) Article 27 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-391.5. Possession of nicotine, hemp, and vapor products.
(a) The Code of Student Conduct developed by the governing body of the public school
unit shall include a policy that if any student under the age of 21 is found in possession of a
nicotine, hemp, or vapor product, as defined in G.S. 115C-407.1, the product shall be confiscated.
The school shall notify the parent or legal guardian of a student who had an item confiscated
pursuant to this section within 24 hours of the confiscation.
(b) For the first offense of being in possession of a nicotine, hemp, or vapor product, the
following actions shall be taken:
(1) A school counselor or other school-based mental health services provider shall
provide to the student and the parent of the student evidence-based,
age-appropriate nicotine, hemp, and vapor product cessation information,
Page 2 House Bill 802-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
including age-appropriate cessation services, including materials, information
on programs, or referrals for treatment.
(2) At least one of the following:
a. A student meeting and individual student assessment with a health
educator, school nurse, counselor, or designated staff with parents
and/or guardians to discuss nicotine, hemp, or vapor product use and
school policy.
b. Student participation in an evidence-based, self-paced nicotine, hemp,
and vapor product use education program.
(c) For the second offense of being in possession of a nicotine, hemp, or vapor product,
a school shall follow the provisions of subsection (b) of this section and the school shall take
disciplinary action as outlined in the Code of Student Conduct and school discipline policies.
(d) For a third or subsequent offense of being in possession of a nicotine, hemp, or vapor
product, a school shall follow the provisions of subsection (b) of this section; however, requiring
educational community service shall be an additional option under subdivision (b)(2) of this
section."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-12(27) reads as rewritten:
"(27) Reporting Dropout Rates, Corporal Punishment, Suspensions, Expulsions,
Alternative Placements, and Alternative Placements. Possession. – The State
Board shall report by March 15 of each year to the Joint Legislative Education
Oversight Committee on the numbers of students who have dropped out of
school, been subjected to corporal punishment, been suspended, been
expelled, been reassigned for disciplinary purposes, or been provided
alternative education services. services, or been disciplined or provided
medical intervention for a violation of G.S. 115C-391.5. The data shall be
reported in a disaggregated manner, reflecting the local school administrative
unit, race, gender, grade level, ethnicity, and disability status of each affected
student. Such data shall be readily available to the public. The State Board
shall not include students that have been expelled from school when
calculating the dropout rate. The Board shall maintain a separate record of the
number of students who are expelled from school and the reasons for the
expulsion."
SECTION 3. No later than September 15, 2025, the Department of Health and
Human Services shall publish on its website nicotine, hemp, and vapor product awareness
information, including the various types of products containing nicotine or hemp and the health
issues associated with nicotine, hemp, and vapor products. The Department shall also publish
and maintain a list of evidence-based resources for use by public schools to provide nicotine,
hemp, and vapor product cessation and use prevention information and programs.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
House Bill 802-First Edition Page 3